es: Flexibilidad de la espátula: Extraflexible; Extrarígido; Flexible; Medio; Rígido; Otro
hu: Festőkés rugalmassága: Extra rugalmas; Extra merev; Rugalmas; Közepes; Merev; Egyéb
pl: Elastyczność szpachelki malarskiej: Bardzo elastyczna; Bardzo sztywna; Elastyczna; Średnia; Sztywna; Inne
pt-PT: Flexibilidade da espátula: Extra flexível; Extra rígido; Flexível; Médio; Rígido; Outro
ja: パレットナイフの柔軟性: エクストラフレキシブル; エクストラスティッフ; フレキシブル; ミディアム; スティッフ; その他
vi: Tính linh hoạt của dao trộn màu: Siêu dẻo; Siêu cứng; Dẻo; Vừa; Cứng; Khác
el: Ευελιξία μαχαιριού παλέτας: Εξαιρετικά εύκαμπτο; Εξαιρετικά άκαμπτο; Εύκαμπτο; Μέτριο; Άκαμπτο; Άλλο
sv: Palettknivens flexibilitet: Extra flexibel; Extra styv; Flexibel; Medium; Styv; Övrigt
nl: Paletmes flexibiliteit: Extra flexibel; Extra stijf; Flexibel; Medium; Stijf; Overig
tr: Palet bıçağı esnekliği: Ekstra esnek; Ekstra sert; Esnek; Orta; Sert; Diğer
bg-BG: Гъвкавост на палитрен нож: Много гъвкав; Много твърд; Гъвкав; Среден; Твърд; Друго
en: Palette knife flexibility: Extra flexible; Extra stiff; Flexible; Medium; Stiff; Other
fr: Souplesse de la lame du couteau à palette: Extra flexible; Extra rigide; Flexible; Moyen; Rigide; Autre
sk-SK: Pružnosť maliarskej špachtle: Extra flexibilný; Extra tuhý; Flexibilný; Stredný; Tuhý; Iné
cs: Flexibilita špachtle: Extra ohebná; Extra pevná; Ohebná; Střední; Pevná; Jiné
zh-TW: 調色刀柔韌度: 超柔韌; 超堅硬; 柔韌; 中等; 堅硬; 其他
fi: Palettiveitsen joustavuus: Erittäin joustava; Erittäin jäykkä; Joustava; Keskijäykkä; Jäykkä; Muu
sl-SI: Prožnost slikarske lopatice: Izjemno upogljiv; Izjemno trd; Upogljiv; Srednji; Trd; Drugo
hr-HR: Fleksibilnost špatule: Iznimno fleksibilan; Iznimno krut; Fleksibilan; Srednji; Krut; Ostalo
ru: Гибкость мастихина: Очень гибкий; Очень жесткий; Гибкий; Средний; Жесткий; Другое
da: Paletknivens fleksibilitet: Ekstra fleksibel; Ekstra stiv; Fleksibel; Mellem; Stiv; Anden
de: Flexibilität des Palettenmessers: Besonders flexibel; Besonders steif; Flexibel; Mittel; Steif; Sonstige
pt-BR: Flexibilidade da espátula: Extraflexível; Extrarrígido; Flexível; Médio; Rígido; Outro
nb: Palettknivens fleksibilitet: Ekstra fleksibel; Ekstra stiv; Fleksibel; Middels; Stiv; Annet
th: ความยืดหยุ่นของมีดเกรียง: ยืดหยุ่นมากเป็นพิเศษ; แข็งมากเป็นพิเศษ; ยืดหยุ่น; ปานกลาง; แข็ง; อื่นๆ
it: Flessibilità della spatola: Extra flessibile; Extra rigido; Flessibile; Medio; Rigido; Altro
zh-CN: 调色刀柔韧性: 超软; 超硬; 柔软; 中等; 偏硬; 其他
ko: 팔레트 나이프 유연성: 매우 유연함; 매우 뻣뻣함; 유연함; 중간; 뻣뻣함; 기타
ro-RO: Flexibilitatea cuțitului de paletă: Extra flexibil; Extra rigid; Flexibil; Mediu; Rigid; Altele
lt-LT: Paletės peilio lankstumas: Ypač lankstus; Ypač standus; Lankstus; Vidutinis; Standus; Kita